Vermont statutes. Title 24 Municipal and County Government
Chapter 113. Housing Authorities
§ 4016.
Bonds, powers, covenants.

In connection with the issuance of bonds, or the incurring of obligations under leases and in order to secure the payment of such bonds or obligations, an authority, in addition to its other powers, shall have power:

To pledge all or any part of its gross or net rents, fees or revenues to which its right then exists, or may thereafter come into existence.

To mortgage all or any part of its real or personal property, then owned or thereafter acquired.

To covenant against pledging all or any part of its rents, fees and revenues, or against mortgaging all or any part of its real or personal property, to which its right or title then exists or may thereafter come into existence or against permitting or suffering any lien on such revenues or properties; to covenant with respect to limitations on its right to sell, lease or otherwise dispose of any housing project or part thereof and to covenant as to what other or additional debts or obligations may be incurred by it.

To covenant as to the bonds to be issued and as to the issuance of such bonds in escrow or otherwise and as to the use and disposition of the proceeds thereof; to provide for the replacement of lost, destroyed, or mutilated bonds; to covenant against extending the time for the payment of its bonds or interest thereon and to redeem the bonds and to covenant for their redemption and to provide the terms and conditions thereof.

To covenant, subject to the limitations contained in this chapter, as to the rents and fees to be charged in the operation of the housing project or projects, the amount to be raised each year or other period of time by rents, fees, and other revenues and as to the use and disposition to be made thereof; to create or to authorize the creation of special funds for moneys held for construction or operating costs, debt service, reserve, or other purposes and to covenant as to the use and disposition of the moneys held in such funds.

To prescribe the procedure, if any, by which the terms of any contract with bond holders may be amended or abrogated, the amount of bonds the holders of which must consent thereto, and the manner in which such consent may be given.

To covenant as to the use of any or all of its real or personal property; to covenant as to the maintenance of its real and personal property; the replacement thereof, the insurance to be carried thereon and the use and disposition of its insurance monies.

To covenant as to the rights, liabilities, powers, and duties arising upon the breach by it of any covenant, condition, or obligation; and to covenant and prescribe as to the events of default and terms and conditions upon which any or all of the bonds or obligations shall become or may be declared due before maturity and as to the terms and conditions upon which such declaration and its consequences may be waived.

To vest in a trustee or trustees or the holders of the bonds or any proportion of them the right to enforce the payment of the bonds, or any covenants securing or relating to the bonds; to vest in a trustee or trustees the right, in the event of a default by said authority, to take possession and use, to operate and manage any housing project or part thereof, and to collect the rents and revenues arising therefrom and to dispose of such monies in accordance with the agreement of the authority with said trustee; to provide for the powers and duties of a trustee or trustees and to limit the liability thereof; and to provide the terms and conditions upon which the trustee or trustees or the holders of bonds or any proportion of them may enforce any covenant or right securing or relating to the bond.

To exercise all or part or a combination of powers granted in this section; to make covenants other than and in addition to the covenants herein expressly authorized, of like or different character; to make such covenants and to do any and all such acts and things as may be necessary or convenient or desirable in order to secure its bonds, or, in the absolute discretion of said authority as will tend to make the bonds more marketable notwithstanding that such covenants, acts, or things are not enumerated in this section.

HISTORY:

1961, No. 212

, § 16, eff. July 11, 1961.

§ 4017.
Rights of obligees.

An obligee of an authority shall have the right in addition to all other rights which may be conferred upon such obligee, subject only to any contractual restrictions binding upon such obligee:

By suit, action, or proceeding to compel said authority and the commissioners, officers, agents, or employees thereof to perform each and every term, provision, and covenant contained in any contract of said authority with or for the benefit of such obligee and to require the carrying out of any or all such covenants or agreements of said authority and the fulfillment of all duties imposed upon said authority by this chapter.

By suit, action, or proceeding, to enjoin any acts or things that may be unlawful, or the violation of any of the rights of any obligee of said authority.

HISTORY:

1961, No. 212

, § 17, eff. July 11, 1961.

§ 4018.
Powers may be conferred on obligee.

An authority shall have power by its resolution, trust indenture, mortgage, lease, or other contract to confer upon any obligee holding or representing a specified amount in bonds, or holding a lease, the right, in addition to all rights that may be otherwise conferred, upon the happening of an event of default as defined in such resolution or instrument, by suit, action, or proceeding in any court of competent jurisdiction:

To cause possession of any housing project or any part thereof to be surrendered to any such obligee.

To obtain the appointment of a receiver of any housing project of said authority or any part thereof and of the rents and profits therefrom. If such receiver be appointed, he or she may enter and take possession of such housing project or any part thereof and operate and maintain the same and collect and receive all fees, rents, revenues, or other charges thereafter arising therefrom and shall keep such monies in a separate account or accounts and apply the same in accordance with the obligations of said authority as the court shall direct.

To require said authority and the commissioners thereof to account as if it and they were the trustees of an express trust.

HISTORY:

1961, No. 212

, § 18, eff. July 11, 1961.

§ 4019.
United States cooperation.

In addition to the powers conferred upon an authority by other provisions of this chapter, an authority is empowered to borrow money or accept grants or other financial assistance from the federal government for, or in aid of, any housing project within its area of operation, to take over or lease or manage any housing project or undertaking constructed or owned by the federal government and to these ends to comply with such conditions and enter into such mortgages, trust indentures, leases, or agreements as may be necessary, convenient, or desirable.
It is the purpose and intent of this chapter to authorize every authority to do any and all things necessary or desirable to secure the financial aid or the cooperation of the federal government in the undertaking, construction, maintenance, or operation of any housing project by such authority.

HISTORY:

1961, No. 212

, § 19, eff. July 11, 1961.

§ 4020.
Taxation.

The property of an authority is declared to be public property used for essential public and governmental purposes and such property and an authority shall be exempt from all taxes and special assessments of the State or any State public body thereof; provided however, that in lieu of such taxes or special assessments, the authority may agree to make payments to the State public body for improvements, services, and facilities furnished by such State public body for the benefit of the housing project, but in no event shall the payments exceed the estimated cost to such State public body of the improvements, services, or facilities to be so furnished.

HISTORY:

1961, No. 212

, § 20, eff. July 11, 1961.

§ 4021.
Governmental services and contracts.

In connection with any housing project located within the area in which it is authorized to act, any State public body may contract with the housing authority with respect to the sum or sums, if any, which the housing authority may agree to pay, during any year or period of years, to the State public body for the improvements, services, and facilities to be furnished by it, for the benefit of said housing project, but in no event shall the amount of such payments exceed the estimated cost to the State public body of the improvements, services, or facilities to be so furnished: provided however, that the absence of a contract for such payments shall in no way relieve any State public body from the duty to furnish, for the benefit of said housing project, customary improvements and such services and facilities as such State public body furnishes customarily without a service fee.

HISTORY:

1961, No. 212

, § 21, eff. July 11, 1961.

§ 4022.
Powers.

For the purpose of aiding and cooperating in the planning, undertaking, construction, or operation of housing projects, located within the area in which it is authorized to act, any State public body may upon such terms, with or without consideration, as it may determine:

dedicate, sell, convey, or lease any of its interest in any property or grant easements, licenses, or any other rights or privileges therein, to a housing authority or the federal government;

cause parks, playgrounds, recreational, community, educational, water, sewer or drainage facilities, or any other works which it is otherwise empowered to undertake, to be furnished adjacent to or in connection with housing projects;

furnish, dedicate, close, pave, install, grade, regrade, plan, or replan streets, roads, roadways, alleys, sidewalks, or other places which it is otherwise empowered to undertake;

plan or replan, zone or rezone, any part of such State public body; make exceptions from building regulations and ordinances; any city may also change its map;

cause services to be furnished to the housing authority of the character which such State public body is otherwise empowered to furnish;

enter into agreements with respect to the exercise by such State public body of its powers relating to the repair, closing, or demolition of unsafe, unsanitary, or unfit dwellings;

employ, notwithstanding the provisions of any other law, any funds belonging to or within the control of such State public body, including funds derived from the sale of furnishings or property or facilities to a housing authority, in the purchase of the bonds or other obligations of the housing authority; and exercise all rights of any holder of such bonds or other obligations;

enter into agreements, which may extend over any period, notwithstanding any provision or rule of law to the contrary, with a housing authority or the federal government respecting the exercise by such State public body of any of the powers herein granted;

do any and all things necessary or convenient to aid and cooperate in the planning, undertaking, construction, or operation of such housing projects; and

in connection with any public improvements made by a State public body exercising the powers herein granted, such State public body may incur the entire expense thereof.

HISTORY:

1961, No. 212

, § 22, eff. July 11, 1961.

§ 4023.
Appropriation.

When any housing authority which is created for any municipality becomes authorized to transact business and exercise its powers therein, the governing body of such municipality shall immediately make an estimate of the amount of money necessary for the administrative expenses and overhead of such housing authority during the first year thereafter and shall appropriate such amount to the authority out of any monies in the treasury of such municipality not appropriated to some other purpose.
The money so appropriated shall be paid to the authority as a donation.
Any municipality located within the area of operation of a housing authority shall have the power from time to time to lend or donate money to the authority.
The housing authority, when it has money available therefore, shall make reimbursement for all loans made to it.

HISTORY:

1961, No. 212

, § 23, eff. July 11, 1961.

§ 4024.
Exercise of authority.

The exercise by a State public body of the powers granted in this chapter may be authorized by resolution of the governing body of such State public body adopted by a majority of the members thereof present at a meeting of said governing body. Such resolution or resolutions shall take effect immediately upon passage and need not thereafter be laid over or published or posted.

HISTORY:

1961, No. 212

, § 24, eff. July 11, 1961.

§ 4025.
Report.

At least once a year, an authority shall file with the clerk a report of its activities for the preceding year and shall make recommendations with reference to such additional legislation or other actions as it deems necessary in order to carry out the purpose of this chapter.

HISTORY:

Amended

1961, No. 212

, § 25, eff. July 11, 1961;

1967, No. 332

(Adj. Sess.), § 6, eff. March 23, 1968;

2011, No. 139

(Adj. Sess.), § 20, eff. May 14, 2012.

§ 4026.
Inconsistent acts.

As far as the provisions of this chapter are inconsistent with any other law, including special act or municipal charter, this chapter shall control.

HISTORY:

Added

1966, No. 69

(Sp. Sess.), § 11, eff. March 14, 1966.

§ 4027.
Joint municipal housing authorities.

The governing bodies of two or more municipalities may, pursuant to and in the manner set forth in section 4003 of this title, adopt a resolution to establish a housing authority for such municipalities.
When the governing bodies of two or more towns adopt such a resolution, they shall also appoint, in the manner set forth in section 4004 of this title, five persons as the commissioners of the authority established.
A housing authority established pursuant to this section shall have the same powers and responsibilities as a housing authority established for a single municipality.

HISTORY:

Added

1977, No. 27

, § 2.